Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1801.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 5-1301, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE5-1301. Definitions In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires: 1. "Adjusted gross event wagering receipts" means an event wagering operator's gross wagering receipts, excluding voided bets, minus winnings paid to authorized participants and any federal excise tax. A deduction from adjusted gross event wagering receipts equal to the value of free bets or promotional credits redeemed by authorized participants may be taken as provided in this paragraph.  The deduction under this paragraph for free bets or promotional credits is limited to the first five years following the effective date of this section April 15, 2021 as follows: (a) For years one and two, a deduction not to exceed twenty percent of an event wagering operator's gross wagering receipts. (b) For year three, a deduction not to exceed fifteen percent of an event wagering operator's gross wagering receipts. (c) For years four and five, a deduction not to exceed ten percent of an event wagering operator's gross wagering receipts. (d) For year six and each year thereafter, a deduction of free bets is not allowed. January 1 following the year in which the event wagering operator begins event wagering operations is considered the first year of event wagering for the purposes of this paragraph. An event wagering operator may deduct up to twenty percent of an event wagering operator's gross wagering receipts during any period that the operator conducts event wagering before January 1 of the first year of event wagering operations. 2. "Department" means the department of gaming. 3. "E-sport event" means an organized, multiplayer video game competition, particularly between professional players, individually or as teams. 4. "Event wagering": (a) Means accepting wagers on sports events or other events, portions of sports events or other events, the individual performance statistics of athletes in a sports event or combination of sports events or the individual performance of individuals in other events or a combination of other events by any system or method of wagering, including in person or over the Internet through websites and on mobile devices. (b) Does not include a fantasy sports contest as defined in section 5-1201. 5. "Event wagering employee" means an employee of an event wagering operator, sports facility, management services provider or limited event wagering operator who is directly involved in the management or control of the conduct of event wagering under this chapter in this state. 6. "Event wagering facility" means a facility at which event wagering is conducted under this chapter. 7. "Event wagering operator" means either: (a) An owner or operator of an Arizona professional sports team or franchise, an operator of a sports facility in this state that hosts an annual tournament on the PGA tour or a promoter of a national association for stock car auto racing national touring race in this state, or the designee of such an owner, operator or promoter, who is licensed to offer event wagering under this chapter.  If an owner, operator or promoter that qualified for an event wagering operator license appoints a designee, the designee will be considered the event wagering operator and the licensee with respect to the applicable license for the purposes of this chapter. (b) An Arizona Indian tribe or an entity fully owned by an Arizona Indian tribe, or its designee, licensed to operate only mobile event wagering outside the boundaries of its Indian lands and throughout this state if it has signed the most recent tribal-state gaming compact and any applicable appendices or amendments. If an Indian tribe that qualified for an event wagering operator license appoints a designee, the designee will be considered the event wagering operator and the licensee with respect to the applicable license for the purposes of this chapter. 10. 8. "Licensee" means a person that holds an event wagering operator license, limited event wagering license, supplier license or management services provider license. 8. 9. "Limited event wagering operator" means a racetrack enclosure or additional wagering facility that holds a permit issued by the division of racing to offer wagers on horseracing and that is licensed under this chapter. 11. 10. "Management services provider" means a person that operates, manages or controls event wagering authorized by this chapter on behalf of an event wagering operator or limited event wagering operator, including developing or operating event wagering platforms and providing odds, lines and global risk management, and may provide services to more than one licensed event wagering operator or licensed limited event wagering operator. 9. "Official league data" means statistics, results, outcomes and other data related to a sports event or other event obtained pursuant to an agreement with the relevant sports governing body or an entity expressly authorized by the sports governing body to provide such information to licensees that authorizes the use of such data for determining the outcome of sports wagers on sports events or other events. 12. 11. "Other event" means a competition of relative skill or an event authorized by the department under this chapter. 13. 12. "Person" means an individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation,  or Indian tribe or an entity fully owned by an Indian tribe, or any other organization or group of persons. 14. 13. "Professional sport" means a sport conducted at the highest level league or organizational play for its respective sport and includes baseball, basketball, football, golf, hockey, soccer and motorsports. 15. 14. "Prohibited conduct" includes any statement, action or other communication intended to unlawfully influence, manipulate or control a betting outcome of a sports event or other event or of any individual occurrence or performance in a sports event or other event in exchange for financial gain or to avoid financial or physical harm. 16. 15. "Prohibited participant" means: (a) Any individual whose participation may undermine the integrity of the wagering,  or the sports event or the other event. (b) Any individual who is prohibited from placing a wager as an agent, proxy or because of self-exclusion. (c) Any individual who is an athlete, coach, referee, player, trainer or personnel of a sports organization in any sports event or other event overseen by that individual's sports organization who, based on information that is not publicly available, has the ability to determine or to unlawfully influence the outcome of a wager. (d) An individual who holds a position of authority or influence sufficient to exert influence over the participants in a sporting contest, including coaches, managers, handlers and athletic trainers, such that their actions can affect the outcome of a wager. (e) An individual with access to exclusive information on any sports event or other event overseen by that individual's sports governing body that is not publicly available information or any individual identified by any lists provided by the sports governing body to the department. 17. 16. "Sports event" means a professional sport or athletic event, a collegiate sport or athletic event, a motor race event, an e-sport event or an olympic event. 18. 17. "Sports facility" means a facility that is owned by a commercial, state or local government or quasi-governmental entity that hosts professional sports events and that holds a seating capacity of more than ten thousand persons at its primary facility, one location in this state that hosts an annual golf tournament on the PGA tour and one location that holds an outdoor motorsports facility that hosts a national association for stock car auto racing national touring race. 19. 18. "Sports governing body" means an organization headquartered in the United States that prescribes final rules and enforces codes of conduct with respect to a sports event and participants in a sports event. 22. 19. "Supplier" means a person that manufactures, distributes or supplies event wagering equipment or software, including event wagering systems. 20. "Tier one sports wager" means a sports wager that is determined solely by the final score or final outcome of the sports event and that is placed before the sports event has begun. 21. "Tier two sports wager" means a sports wager that is not a tier one sports wager. 23. 22. "Wager": (a) Means a sum of money or thing of value risked on an uncertain occurrence. (b) Includes tier one and tier two sports wagers, single-game bets, teaser bets, parlays, over-under bets, moneyline bets, pools, exchange wagering, in-game wagering, in-play bets, proposition bets, straight bets and other wagers approved by the department. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 5-1314, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE5-1314. Event wagering authorized A. Notwithstanding any other law relating to wagering except for title 5, chapter 1 of this title and title 13, chapter 33, the operation of event wagering is lawful only if the event wagering is conducted in accordance with this chapter and any other relevant laws and rules. B. Notwithstanding section 5-112, wagers on racing meetings or simulcasted races may be made, offered or received through the means that other wagers allowed by this chapter are made, offered or received unless otherwise prohibited by federal law. C. Each event wagering operator shall adopt and adhere to a written, comprehensive policy outlining the house rules governing the acceptance of wagers and payouts.  The policy and rules must be approved by the department before the event wagering operator accepts wagers.  The policy and rules must be readily available to a bettor at any event wagering facility location and on any event wagering platform. D. The department shall adopt rules regarding: 1. The manner in which an event wagering operator accepts wagers from and issues payouts to bettors, including payouts in excess of $10,000. 2. Reporting requirements necessary to comply with the bank secrecy act (P.L. 91-508; 84 Stat. 1114) and patriot act (P.L. 107-56; 115 Stat. 272) and for any other applicable laws and rules governing reporting suspicious wagers. E. Each wager placed in accordance with this chapter is deemed to be an enforceable contract under law. F. An event wagering operator, as prescribed in section 5-1304, subsection A, may use official league data, nonofficial league data or alternative league data for the purposes of tier two sports wagers.  If the governing body of a sport or sports league, organization or association or other authorized entity or provider of league data that maintains or provides official league data opts to provide official league data for the purposes of event wagering, an event wagering operator shall exclusively use The official league data for purposes of tier two sports wagers unless the event wagering operator can demonstrate to the department that the governing body of a sport or sports league, organization or association or other authorized entity cannot provide a feed of official league data for tier two sports wagers in accordance with commercially reasonable terms, as determined by the department shall not be bundled.  The authorized entity or provider of official league data shall list, price, offer, lease and sell official league data separately by league or sport and the event wagering operator may choose specific league data based on a single league or sport.  An event wagering operator shall not be required to purchase official league data for a fixed-price, multi-league data or by a sport menu. END_STATUTE